Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201544-4049
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Insurance Producers Licensing Act:

(1) Business entity means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity;

(2) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(3) Home state means the state in which an insurance producer maintains his or her principal place of residence or principal place of business and is licensed to act as an insurance producer;

(4) Insurance has the same meaning as in section 44-102;

(5) Insurance producer or producer has the same meaning as in section 44-103;

(6) Insurer has the same meaning as in section 44-103;

(7) License means a document issued by the director authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer for the lines of authority specified in the document. The license itself does not create any authority, actual, apparent, or inherent, in the holder to represent or commit an insurer;

(8) Limited line credit insurance includes credit life, credit disability, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability, guaranteed automobile protection insurance, and any other form of insurance offered in connection with an extension of credit that is limited to partially or wholly extinguishing that credit obligation that the director determines should be designated a form of limited line credit insurance;

(9) Limited line credit insurance producer means a person who sells, solicits, or negotiates one or more forms of limited line credit insurance coverage to individuals through a master, corporate, group, or individual policy;

(10) Limited line pre-need funeral insurance means life insurance or a fixed annuity contract purchased by or on behalf of the insured solely to pay the costs of funeral services or funeral service merchandise to be purchased from a funeral home establishment or cemetery;

(11) Limited line pre-need funeral insurance producer means a person who sells, solicits, or negotiates limited line pre-need funeral insurance coverage to individuals;

(12) Limited lines insurance means any authority granted by the home state which restricts the authority of the license to less than the total authority prescribed in the associated major lines pursuant to subsection (1) of section 44-4054 or any line of insurance that the director may deem it necessary to recognize for the purposes of complying with subsection (5) of section 44-4055;

(13) Limited lines producer means a person authorized by the director to sell, solicit, or negotiate limited lines insurance;

(14) Negotiate means the act of conferring directly with or offering advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms, or conditions of the contract, if the person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers;

(15) Person means any individual or business entity;

(16) Sell means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurance company;

(17) Solicit means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular company;

(18) State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

(19) Terminate means the cancellation of the relationship between an insurance producer and the insurer or the termination of a producer's authority to transact insurance;

(20) Uniform application means the uniform application as prescribed by the director which conforms substantially to the uniform application for resident and nonresident producer licensing adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners; and

(21) Uniform business entity application means the uniform business entity application as prescribed by the director which conforms substantially to the uniform business entity application for resident and nonresident business entities adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB198, § 3.
August 30, 2015